Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-238 Validity of noncomplying forms.
Any insurance policy, rider or endorsement hereafter issued and otherwise
valid, is not rendered invalid by the inclusion of any condition or provision
not in compliance with the requirements of this part, but shall be construed
and applied in accordance with such conditions and provisions as would have
applied had the policy, rider or endorsement been in full compliance with this
code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next